Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5704
Applicability of section; exception; controlled insurer; controlling producer; requirements; audit committee; filings required; report.

(1) The provisions of this section shall apply if, in any calendar year, the aggregate amount of gross written premium on business placed with a controlled insurer by a controlling producer is equal to or greater than five percent of the admitted assets of the controlled insurer, as reported in the controlled insurer's annual statement as of December 31 of the prior year, except that the provisions of this section shall not apply if:

(a) The controlling producer:

(i) Places insurance only with the controlled insurer or only with the controlled insurer and a member or members of the controlled insurer's holding company system or the controlled insurer's parent, affiliate, or subsidiary and receives no compensation based upon the amount of premiums written in connection with such insurance; and

(ii) Accepts insurance placements only from nonaffiliated subproducers and not directly from insureds; and

(b) The controlled insurer, except for insurance business written through a residual market facility, accepts insurance business only from a controlling producer, a producer controlled by the controlled insurer, or a producer that is a subsidiary of the controlled insurer.

(2) A controlled insurer shall not accept business from a controlling producer and a controlling producer shall not place business with a controlled insurer unless there is a written contract between the controlling producer and the controlled insurer specifying the responsibilities of each party, which contract has been approved by the board of directors of the controlled insurer and contains the following minimum provisions:

(a) The controlled insurer may terminate the contract for cause upon written notice to the controlling producer. The controlled insurer shall suspend the authority of the controlling producer to write business during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for the termination;

(b) The controlling producer shall render accounts to the controlled insurer detailing all material transactions, including information necessary to support all commissions, charges, and other fees received by or owing to the controlling producer;

(c) The controlling producer shall remit all funds due under the terms of the contract to the controlled insurer on at least a monthly basis. The due date shall be fixed so that premiums or installments thereof collected shall be remitted not later than ninety days after the effective date of any policy placed with the controlled insurer under the contract;

(d) All funds collected for the controlled insurer's account shall be held by the controlling producer in a fiduciary capacity, in one or more appropriately identified bank accounts in banks that are members of the Federal Reserve System, in accordance with Chapter 44, except that funds of a controlling producer not required to be licensed in this state shall be maintained in compliance with the requirements of the controlling producer's domiciliary jurisdiction;

(e) The controlling producer shall maintain separately identifiable records of business written for the controlled insurer;

(f) The contract shall not be assigned in whole or in part by the controlling producer;

(g) The controlled insurer shall provide the controlling producer with its underwriting standards, rules, procedures, manuals setting forth the rates to be charged, and conditions for the acceptance or rejection of risks. The controlling producer shall adhere to the standards, rules, procedures, rates, and conditions. The standards, rules, procedures, rates, and conditions shall be the same as those applicable to comparable business placed with the controlled insurer by a producer other than the controlling producer;

(h) The rates and terms of the controlling producer's commissions, charges, or other fees and the purposes for those commissions, charges, or fees. The rates of the commissions, charges, and other fees shall be no greater than those applicable to comparable business placed with the controlled insurer by a producer other than the controlling producer;

(i) If the contract provides that the controlling producer, on insurance business placed with the controlled insurer, is to be compensated contingent upon the controlled insurer's profits on that business, such compensation shall not be determined and paid until at least five years after the premiums on liability insurance are earned and at least one year after the premiums are earned on any other insurance. In no event shall the commissions be paid until the adequacy of the controlled insurer's reserves on remaining claims has been independently verified pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;

(j) A limit on the controlling producer's writings in relation to the controlled insurer's surplus and total writings. The controlled insurer may establish a different limit for each line or subline of business. The controlled insurer shall notify the controlling producer when the applicable limit is approached and shall not accept business from the controlling producer if the limit is reached. The controlling producer shall not place business with the controlled insurer if it has been notified by the controlled insurer that the limit has been reached; and

(k) The controlling producer may negotiate but shall not bind reinsurance on behalf of the controlled insurer on business the controlling producer places with the controlled insurer, except that the controlling producer may bind facultative reinsurance contracts pursuant to obligatory facultative agreements if the contract with the controlled insurer contains underwriting guidelines, including, for both reinsurance assumed and ceded, a list of reinsurers with which such automatic agreements are in effect, the coverages and amounts or percentages that may be reinsured, and commission schedules.

For purposes of this subsection, examples of comparable business include the same lines of insurance, same kinds of insurance, same kinds of risks, similar policy limits, and similar quality of business.

(3) Every controlled insurer shall have an audit committee of the board of directors composed of independent directors. The audit committee shall annually meet with management, the controlled insurer's independent certified public accountants, and an independent casualty actuary or other independent loss reserve specialist acceptable to the director to review the adequacy of the controlled insurer's loss reserves.

(4) In addition to any other required loss reserve certification, the controlled insurer shall annually, on April 1 of each year, file with the director an opinion of an independent casualty actuary or such other independent loss reserve specialist acceptable to the director reporting loss ratios for each line of business written and attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and outstanding as of year end, including losses incurred but not reported and loss adjustment expenses, on business placed by the controlling producer. The controlled insurer shall annually report to the director the amount of commissions paid to the controlling producer, the percentage such amount represents of the net premiums written, and comparable amounts and percentages paid to noncontrolling producers for placements of the same kinds of insurance.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 71.